Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB243.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Article XXIV-A heading of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended to read:1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829 ARTICLE XXIV-ADISPOSITION OF COMMONWEALTH [SURPLUS] LANDSection 2. The definition of "surplus property" in section 2401-A of the act is amended to read:Section 2401-A. Limited Definitions.--The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Surplus property." Any buildings, land or other real estate owned by the Commonwealth that under section 2402-A(a) has been deemed surplus to the needs of the administering agency which has current use of the property. The definition of and the designation of surplus property shall not apply to any lands designated as State parks or State forests or any lands acquired by the Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission or the Pennsylvania Game Commission.Section 3. Sections 2402-A(c), 2403-A and 2405-A of the act are amended to read:Section 2402-A. Annual Property Survey.--* * *(c) For all [real property identified as surplus by an agency] surplus property, the department shall determine whether any other agencies have an appropriate use for the property. If it is desirable and appropriate to transfer surplus property to another agency [property that has been deemed surplus by the administering agency currently using the property], the department shall prepare a plan for transfer of the surplus property. Upon approval of the transfer plan by the General Counsel and the Secretary of Budget and Administration, use of the surplus property shall be transferred to the agency that can 20250SB0243PN0196 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 make the best use of the surplus property.Section 2403-A. Surplus Property Disposition [Plan.--] Plan; and Commonwealth Land Disposition.--(a) The department shall annually develop a plan for the orderly disposition of all [real property deemed surplus by the agency currently in possession of the property, which property is not suitable for use by another agency] surplus property.(b) The plan shall consider the following factors in proposing the manner and schedule for property disposition:(1) Whether the property should be leased, transferred in fee simple, or transferred with a restriction as to use, right of reversion, or other special deed provisions.(2) Whether the land should be retained in agricultural use or as open space for recreation or conservation. A determination whether land should be preserved as open space or in agricultural use shall be made in consultation with the Department of Agriculture, the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources, the Department of Environmental [Resources] Protection and the Department of Community [Affairs] and Economic Development.(3) Likely cost savings and expenses to the Commonwealth arising from the proposed property disposition.(4) The needs of local governments, charitable institutions, and local volunteer fire and rescue squads.(5) The likely revenue to be generated by the sale of the property and the needs of the Commonwealth for those revenues.(c) The plan for the disposition of surplus property shall, for each parcel, identify the proposed manner of disposition, when the property will be disposed of, likely revenues and costs, the assessed market value of the property, and the 20250SB0243PN0196 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth's acquisition cost for the property.(d) Any Commonwealth lands acquired by condemnation which is later determined to be surplus land shall be disposed pursuant to and consistent with the provisions of section 2003(e) and the provisions of the act of June 22, 1964 (Sp.Sess., P.L.84, No.6), known as the "Eminent Domain Code."(e) The department may only sell Commonwealth lands, other than surplus property, upon an act of the General Assembly and in accordance with the conditions specified in section 2405-A(b).Section 2405-A. Conditions Upon Conveyances.--(a) Any proposed disposition of surplus property shall be subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The department may sell real estate only to [an individual, an organization, a firm or corporation,] a political subdivision of the Commonwealth, or to the Government of the United States or a branch or agency thereof.(2) Following approval of the property disposition plan, information regarding the availability and sale of each parcel of surplus property shall be provided through the publication of legal notice in the Pennsylvania Bulletin and such State newspapers as the department shall direct.(3) The remuneration for a conveyance of surplus property shall be based on fair consideration. Fair consideration requires either the payment of the current fair market value of the property or the demonstration of equivalent or greater return to the Commonwealth within five years due to the proposed use of the property by the entity receiving the conveyance.(4) After appropriate public notice, the sale of declared surplus property by the department shall be open to public 20250SB0243PN0196 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 review and inspection. Acceptance of an offer shall be subject to a minimum price requirement as established by the department, which shall not be less than the fair market value. Declared surplus property shall be sold by the department through either a competitive sealed bidding process in which prospective buyers submit sealed offers through the mail or at an auction conducted by an auctioneer holding a license under the provisions of the act of December 22, 1983 (P.L.327, No.85), known as the "Auctioneer and Auction Licensing Act." The use of either method of sale shall be at the department's discretion. Except as provided in clause (3), sale of the declared surplus property shall be to the highest bidder, provided that no offer may be accepted which is below the fair market value, established through independent appraisal.(5) The disposition of surplus property shall be made upon such terms and conditions of sale as the department may prescribe. The sale of such real estate may be in the form of a lump sum purchase, installment purchase or lease purchase and may include use restrictions and reverter clauses. The term and conditions of sale and the form of purchase shall reflect current market conditions, shall afford maximum protection of Commonwealth assets and shall prescribe procedures to be utilized in the event of default. In the case of the sale of authority properties, the sale of such property shall be in accordance to the applicable bond indentures.(6) The deed of conveyance shall expressly reserve all oil, gas and mineral rights to the Commonwealth.(b) Any proposed disposition of real property of the Commonwealth, other than surplus property, shall be subject to the following conditions and limitations:20250SB0243PN0196 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The department may sell real estate only to a political subdivision of the Commonwealth, or to the Government of the United States or a branch or agency thereof.(2) Following enactment of an act of the General Assembly authorizing the conveyance of the real property, t he department shall transmit information regarding the availability and sale of each parcel to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin and may publish the information in State newspapers.(3) The remuneration for a conveyance of surplus property shall be based on fair consideration. Fair consideration requires either the payment of the current fair market value of the property or the demonstration of equivalent or greater return to the Commonwealth within five years due to the proposed use of the property by the entity receiving the conveyance.(4) After appropriate public notice, the sale of the real property by the department shall be open to public review and inspection. Acceptance of an offer shall be subject to a minimum price requirement as established by the department, which shall not be less than the fair market value. The real property shall be sold by the department through either a competitive sealed bidding process in which prospective buyers submit sealed offers through the mail or at an auction conducted by an auctioneer holding a license under the provisions of the "Auctioneer and Auction Licensing Act." The use of either method of sale shall be at the department's discretion. Except as provided in clause (3), sale of the real property shall be to the highest bidder, provided that no offer may be accepted which is below the fair market value, established through independent appraisal.(5) The disposition of the real property shall be made upon 20250SB0243PN0196 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 such terms and conditions of sale as the department may prescribe. The sale of the real property may be in the form of a lump sum purchase, installment purchase or lease purchase and may include use restrictions and reverter clauses. The term and conditions of sale and the form of purchase shall reflect current market conditions, shall afford maximum protection of Commonwealth assets and shall prescribe procedures to be utilized in the event of default. In the case of the sale of authority real property, the sale shall be in accordance to the applicable bond indentures.(6) The deed of conveyance shall expressly reserve all oil, gas and mineral rights to the Commonwealth.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0243PN0196 - 7 - 12345678910111213